Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Automatic Data Processing.

Sec. 44.21.150.
Declaration of purpose.

It is the purpose of AS

44.21.150

—

44.21.170

to designate the Department of Administration as the department responsible for the operation and management of automatic data processing resources and activities of the executive branch of state government and the judicial and legislative branches to the extent requested by those branches, and to provide for periodic review of state automatic data processing procedures and mechanisms. It is further the purpose of these sections to encourage cooperation between the state government and local governments in the use of automatic data processing systems.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 53 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2005; am E.O. No. 113 § 8 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.67.010. Renumbered in 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For verification of electronic signatures, see 2 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 44.21.160.
Powers and duties of department.

Except as otherwise provided in (g) of this section, the department shall comply with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner in providing automatic data processing services responsive to the needs of state government.

To carry out (a) of this section the department may, consistent with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner and with the departmental information systems plan,

maintain a central staff of systems analysts, computer programmers, and other staff members sufficient to provide systems analysis and computer programming support required by the executive branch of state government;

develop and maintain both short-range and long-range data processing plans for state government and provide managerial leadership in the use of automatic data processing;

review all budget requests for automatic data processing services and recommend to the commissioner and the governor approval, modification, or disapproval;

recommend implementation priorities of requested data processing systems;

determine and satisfy the data processing equipment and supply requirements of the executive branch, departments, and agencies of state government;

provide all facilities, equipment, and staff required to convert data to a form suitable for processing on automatic data processing equipment;

develop and publish systems analysis, computer programming, and computer operations standards;

review state automatic data processing systems to encourage effectiveness, measure performance, and assure adherence to the standards developed under AS

44.21.150

—

44.21.170

;

develop and conduct an automatic data processing training program designed to serve the technical and managerial needs of state government;

charge a state agency or other governmental agency for the cost of the automatic data processing services provided or procured by the department for the agency.

The department may cooperate with political subdivisions of the state in the development and operation of data processing systems and may allow for the use of state facilities by political subdivisions.

In accordance with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner, the department and the University of Alaska may develop and implement a plan for the integration of automatic data processing facilities of the university with the state facilities.

If the action is not contrary to the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner, this section does not prohibit

the department from obtaining necessary contractual assistance for automatic data processing activities;

the legislature from recruiting and employing data processing personnel or from obtaining necessary contractual assistance for automatic data processing activities;

the judicial branch from establishing independent data processing policies and implementation procedures; however, the policies and procedures must permit information exchange and implementation procedures compatible with other branches of government whenever practical.

The department shall provide for the effective transfer of information by telecommunications through the establishment of compatible systems and common standards.

The department shall provide or procure automatic data processing services under AS

44.21.150

—

44.21.170

for the judicial branch to the extent requested by that branch, and may charge the branch for the services.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 156 SLA 1990.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 50, § 8 (1981); am §§ 2 — 4 ch 123 SLA 1986; am § 68 ch 138 SLA 1986; am §§ 4 — 7 ch 53 SLA 1987; am § 38 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 156 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2005; am E.O. No. 113 §§ 9 — 12 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.67.020. Renumbered in 1972. Former subsection (h) was enacted as (g) and relettered in 1986.

Administrative Code. —

For verification of electronic signatures, see 2 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 44.21.170.
Definitions.

In AS

44.21.150

—

44.21.170

,

“automatic data processing” means

those methods of processing data by using electrical accounting machinery (EAM) or electronic data processing equipment (EDP), including the activities and devices required to prepare data for automatic data processing;

data communications devices and those systems used with automatic data processing equipment in the transmission and reception of data; and

activities related to the design and development of automatic data processing systems;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“department” means the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.67.030. Renumbered in 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For verification of electronic signatures, see 2 AAC 5, art. 3.

Secs. 44.21.200 — 44.21.230.
Alaska Commission on Aging. [Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003). For current law, see AS 47.45.200 — 47.45.290.]

Secs. 44.21.231 — 44.21.239.
Long-term care ombudsman. [Repealed, E.O. No. 102, § 10, (2001). For current law, see AS 47.62.010 — 47.62.090.]

Sec. 44.21.240.
[Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003).]

Secs. 44.21.241 — 44.21.255.
Alaska Council on Science and Technology. [Repealed, § 63 ch 21 SLA 1985.]